Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 53.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-153
Appeal from rejection of reinstatement.

(ULLCA 707) (a) If the
Secretary of State rejects a limited liability company's application for reinstatement
following administrative dissolution, the Secretary of State shall prepare,
sign, and file a notice that explains the reason for rejection and serve the
company with a copy of the notice.

(b) Within thirty days
after service of a notice of rejection of reinstatement under subsection (a)
of this section, a limited liability company may appeal from the rejection
by petitioning the district court of Lancaster County to set aside the dissolution.
The petition must be served on the Secretary of State and contain a copy of
the Secretary of State's declaration of dissolution, the company's application
for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State's notice of rejection.

(c) The court may order
the Secretary of State to reinstate a dissolved limited liability company
or take other action the court considers appropriate.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 53.